Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,118
Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices; adoption by Department of Transportation.

Consistent with the provisions of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, the Department of Transportation may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations adopting and implementing a manual providing a uniform system of traffic control devices on all highways within this state which, together with any supplements adopted by the department, shall be known as the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 98;

Laws 1984, LB 677, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-698;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 214;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 193.